Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB566.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 103 of the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Historical agricultural building." A building initially constructed before January 1, 1999, as an agricultural building and that is used for occupancy by the general public for 12345678910111213141516171819 weddings, receptions and similar social events throughout the year.* * *Section 2. Section 104(b) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 104. Application.* * *(b) Exclusions.--This act shall not apply to any of the following:* * *(4.1) A historical agricultural building if the owner of the building annually files an affidavit with the code administrator stating that an inspection report was issued by a code administrator on the building and the following conditions are satisfied or, if the owner fails to do so, the code administrator inspects the building at the owner's expense and determines that the following conditions are satisfied:(i) The building complies with the fire safety provisions for historic buildings of the International Code Council's International Existing Building Code that was part of the Uniform Construction Code at the time of inspection, except that the building is not required to install an automatic fire sprinkler system.(ii) The building has functioning:(A) hard-wired smoke detectors if electrical wiring has been installed in the interior of the building; or(B) battery-powered detectors if electrical wiring has not been installed in the interior of the 20250SB0566PN0556 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 building.(iii) Portable fire extinguishers are placed in the building consistent with the Uniform Construction Code.(iv) If electrical wiring has been installed in the interior of the building, an inspection report by a code administrator states that the wiring complies with the electrical provisions of the Uniform Construction Code that existed at the time of inspection.(v) Smoking is prohibited in the building.(vi) All open flames are prohibited in the building, except for flames used for the purposes of reheating or maintaining food temperatures and for which the heating source requires no installation as part of the building construction.(vii) The owner maintains for the building liability insurance that is written and issued by an insurer authorized to do business in this Commonwealth.(viii) Signs are posted at the external entrances to all areas of the building used for weddings, receptions and similar social events that state:(A) The maximum occupancy of the building per the requirements of the International Building Code that was part of the Uniform Construction Code at the time of the inspection.(B) "This facility is subject to alternative commercial building and public safety requirements as provided under the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act."(ix) Unless permitted toilet facilities are provided on the grounds of the building, portable toilet 20250SB0566PN0556 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facilities are provided in accordance with the minimum number of required toilets for a restaurant or banquet hall in the International Building Code that was part of the Uniform Construction Code at the time of inspection.(x) The building complies with the accessibility provisions for historic buildings in the International Code Council's International Existing Building Code determined by the Accessibility Advisory Board.(xi) The building complies with the change of use provisions for historic buildings in the International Code Council's International Existing Building Code that was part of the Uniform Construction Code at the time of inspection.(xii) The primary function remains on the level of exit discharge. The occupancy level of the stories in a multilevel building must be determined by the code administrator and may not exceed levels as determined by the International Building Code that was part of the Uniform Construction Code at the time of inspection.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0566PN0556 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021